Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.160.193

Transportation alternate funding grant program.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, a transportation alternate funding grant program is created.

(2) As part of the award process for the grants, the superintendent of public instruction must include a review of the school district's efficiency rating, key performance indicators, and local school district characteristics such as unique geographic constraints, low enrollment, geographic density of students, the percentage of students served under the McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act from outside the district, or whether the district is a nonhigh district.

[ 2018 c 266 s 103.]